incubator/apertium-lat/apertium-lat.lat.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
  Latin morphological analyser for Apertium
  
  Resources for Latin are bountiful...
  much of this lexicon was imported from AFGL's Latin lexicon
  http://www.agfl.cs.ru.nl/lat/generating.html

 # Latin grammar and lexicon constructed by
 # Cornelis H.A. Koster for Tineke E.Koster
 # as part of the AGFL project
 # C.H.A. Koster, dec 2003 
 
#   This grammar is free software; you can use it, redistribute it
#   and/or modify it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public
#   License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either
#   version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#   This grammar is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
#   Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#   You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#   License along with this library; if not, write to the Free Software
#   Foundation, Inc., 59 Temple Place, Suite 330, Boston, MA 02111-1307 USA
 
-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzŀlāēīōū</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>  
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="abl"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
      
    <sdef n="pers"/>      

    <sdef n="num"/>

    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>

    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>

    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>

    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>

    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
      
    <sdef n="adj"/>

    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="ftp"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="impf"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="infp"/>
    <sdef n="pmp"/>
    <sdef n="pms"/>
    <sdef n="pfs"/>
    <sdef n="pfut"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="act"/>
    <sdef n="psv"/>
      
    <sdef n="sp"/>
      
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
     
    <sdef n="qnt"/>

    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>

    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Adjectives -->  
    <pardef n="alt/us__adj">
        <e><p><l>us</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>um</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ō</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ō</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ōs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ōrum</l>            <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>am</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ae</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ae</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ā</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ae</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ae</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ās</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ārum</l>            <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>um</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>um</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>um</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ō</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ō</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ōrum</l>            <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- Numerals -->  
      

    <e lm="altus"><i>alt</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
